Wisconsin, session 2025, SB798.
do enact as follows:SB798,11Section 1. 15.347 (22) (b) 9. of the statutes is amended to read:SB798,2,7215.347 (22) (b) 9. The possibility of a professional, whose wetland delineation 3work is assured under the department of natural resources’ wetland delineation 4professional assurance initiative, performing a wetland delineation confirmation 5requirements for certification as an assured delineator and other matters related to 6the wetland assured delineator program under s. 23.321 on behalf of the 7department (2d).SB798,28Section 2. 23.321 (2d) of the statutes is created to read:SB798,3,3123.321 (2d) Wetland assured delineation program. (a) Definition. In 2this subsection, “assured delineator” means a professional wetland delineator who 3is certified by the department under par. (c).SB798,3,94(b) Program. 1. The department shall establish a wetland assured 5delineation program under which individuals may apply to the department to be 6certified as assured delineators. Under the program, the department shall ensure 7that assured delineators delineate wetlands consistent with the wetlands 8delineation manual described under s. 281.36 (2m). The department may 9promulgate rules to implement this subsection.SB798,3,14102. Under the program, a wetland delineation prepared by an assured 11delineator has the same effect as a wetland identification or confirmation prepared 12by the department under sub. (2) (b) to (d). A wetland delineation performed by an 13assured delineator is not required to be confirmed by the department under sub. (2) 14(c) or (d).SB798,4,3153. The department shall require an assured delineator to submit to the 16department a report of each wetland delineation the assured delineator seeks to 17have accepted as an assured wetland delineation. The assured delineator shall 18include in the report all items required in applicable joint guidance from the U.S. 19army corps of engineers and the department. To be accepted as an assured wetland 20delineation, the assured delineator shall submit the report under this subdivision 21no later than March 15, unless an extension is approved by the department. The 22department shall grant an extension request, except that a report under this 23subdivision may receive only one extension, which may not extend more than 12 1months from the date the extension is granted. Any wetland delineation report or 2other information related to the wetland delineation that is not submitted to the 3department may not be considered an assured wetland delineation.SB798,4,744. Under the program, assured delineators shall conduct assured wetland 5delineations during the growing season. The growing season shall be determined 6in accordance with the wetlands delineation manual described under s. 281.36 (2m) 7and applicable supplements.SB798,4,108(c) Application. 1. A professional wetland delineator seeking to become 9certified as an assured delineator shall submit a complete application and shall 10follow the application procedures specified by the department.SB798,4,16112. The department shall, in consultation with the wetland study council, 12determine what must be submitted by an applicant to constitute a complete 13application. Once established, the department shall make those requirements 14available on the department’s website. The department may not determine an 15application to be complete without submission of the application fee under par. (e) 161. a.SB798,4,18173. The department shall establish application and qualification requirements 18for certification as an assured delineator, including at least all of the following:SB798,4,2019a. An associate degree with at least 8 years of full-time professional field 20experience in wetland delineation.SB798,4,2221ag. A bachelor’s degree with at least 5 years of full-time professional field 22experience in wetland delineation.SB798,5,21ar. A master’s degree or doctorate degree with at least 3 years of full-time 2professional field experience in wetland delineation.SB798,5,53b. Completion of minimum educational requirements or requirements for 4commensurate experience, as determined by the department in consultation with 5the wetland study council.SB798,5,86c. Completion of a wetland delineation training course based on the wetlands 7delineation manual described under s. 281.36 (2m) and applicable regional 8supplements for this state.SB798,5,119d. Submittal of at least 6 representative wetland delineation reports 10completed within the 2 growing seasons preceding the date on which the 11application was submitted.SB798,5,12124. Status as an assured delineator is valid unless revoked under par. (d).SB798,5,15135. If the department determines that the applicant does not meet the 14minimum qualifications to be approved as an assured delineator, the applicant may 15reapply in a future application process.SB798,5,18166. The department shall accept applications no less than annually and at least 17during the period beginning September 15 and ending November 30 for applicants 18who wish to be certified beginning on March 15 of the next calendar year.SB798,5,23197. The department may consider previous conduct and performance in scoring 20a subsequent application for an applicant whose prior certification under the 21program was revoked under par. (d). The department may not approve an 22application if the applicant’s certification was revoked within 3 years of the 23application date.SB798,6,61(d) Performance review, auditing, and revocation. 1. The department shall 2review the performance of assured delineators on a recurring basis to ensure the 3program standards and expectations are being met. As part of this review process, 4the department may perform in-field audits of specific wetland delineations that 5assured delineators have submitted in the 12 months preceding the beginning of 6the audit.SB798,6,1272. Upon a complaint submitted by any person to the department that an 8assured delineator may have failed to accurately identify wetlands on a property for 9which a report under par. (b) 3. was submitted in the 12 months preceding the date 10of the complaint, the department may investigate and gather information to 11determine if the report fails to accurately identify the presence and boundaries of a 12wetland on the property.SB798,6,21133. a. If data gathered under subd. 1. or 2. show substantial evidence that a 14wetland delineation was conducted in a manner that is not supported by the 15wetlands delineation manual described under s. 281.36 (2m) and applicable 16regional supplements for this state in effect at the time the field work was 17completed, the department shall so notify the assured delineator and require the 18assured delineator to correct the report under par. (b) 3. Any deadline for 19department action with respect to a wetland general or individual permit or 20exemption under s. 281.36 is tolled on the date of that notification until the assured 21delineator corrects and resubmits the report under par. (b) 3.SB798,6,2322b. The department may not modify a permit or exemption decision under s. 23281.36 on the basis of data gathered under subd. 1. or 2.SB798,7,31c. The department may use the data gathered under subd. 1. or 2. to evaluate 2an assured delineator’s compliance with program requirements under this 3subsection.SB798,7,544. The department shall give notice to an assured delineator if the 5department conducts an audit under subd. 1. or an investigation under subd. 2.SB798,7,965. The department may revoke an individual’s certification as an assured 7delineator by providing to the individual written notice of the revocation and the 8reason for the revocation if it finds the individual did any of the following, taking 9into consideration the type and frequency of infractions:SB798,7,1110a. Knowingly took part in an activity that results in the violation of state or 11federal wetland or waterway laws or regulations.SB798,7,1212b. Knowingly falsified or misrepresented a wetland boundary.SB798,7,1413c. Failed to delineate all wetland resources within a wetland delineation study 14area.SB798,7,1515d. Misrepresented another’s work as his or her own.SB798,7,1816e. Failed to apply standard wetland delineation protocols in line with the 17wetlands delineation manual described under s. 281.36 (2m) and applicable 18regional supplements for this state.SB798,7,1919f. Failed to meet continuing education expectations as set by the department.SB798,7,2220g. Failed to submit an average of at least 3 delineation reports annually over 21the prior 3 years, unless an exception is made by the department for extenuating 22circumstances.SB798,8,3236. Any individual who receives notice under subd. 5. that his or her 1certification as an assured delineator has been revoked is entitled to a contested 2case hearing under ch. 227 if the individual requests the hearing within 30 days 3after receiving the notice.SB798,8,547. An individual whose certification as an assured delineator is revoked is not 5precluded from delineating wetlands under sub. (2) (c) or (d). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb798 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb798 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB798 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB798 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB798: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting